District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-173

Multiple party returns.

Repealed.

History

June 14, 1994, D.C. Law 10-128, § 203, 41 DCR 2096
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(b), 48 DCR 334

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-173.

Editor's Notes

Section 410(e) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(b), (d), (f), (l), (n), (o), (r), (v), (x)through (aa), (cc), (ff), (gg), (ll), (pp), (vv), (ww), (aaa), (ccc), (eee), and (ggg) shall apply as of January 1, 2001.”